Missouri, session 2026, HB3072.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 287.200 and 287.470, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 287.200 and 287.470, to read as follows:
287.200. 1. Compensation for permanent total disability shall be paid during the
continuance of such disability from the date of maximum medical improvement for the
lifetime of the employee at the weekly rate of compensation in effect under this subsection on
the date of the injury for which compensation is being made. The word "employee" as used
in this section shall not include the injured worker's dependents, estate, or other persons to
whom compensation may be payable as provided in subsection 1 of section 287.020. The
amount of such compensation shall be computed as follows:
(1) For all injuries occurring on or after September 28, 1983, but before September
28, 1986, the weekly compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-six and two-thirds
percent of the injured employee's average weekly earnings during the year immediately
preceding the injury, as of the date of the injury; provided that the weekly compensation paid
under this subdivision shall not exceed an amount equal to seventy percent of the state
average weekly wage, as such wage is determined by the division of employment security, as
of the July first immediately preceding the date of injury;
(2) For all injuries occurring on or after September 28, 1986, but before August 28,
1990, the weekly compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent
of the injured employee's average weekly earnings during the year immediately preceding the
injury, as of the date of the injury; provided that the weekly compensation paid under this
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3072 2
subdivision shall not exceed an amount equal to seventy-five percent of the state average
weekly wage, as such wage is determined by the division of employment security, as of the
July first immediately preceding the date of injury;
(3) For all injuries occurring on or after August 28, 1990, but before August 28, 1991,
the weekly compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the
injured employee's average weekly earnings as of the date of the injury; provided that the
weekly compensation paid under this subdivision shall not exceed an amount equal to one
hundred percent of the state average weekly wage;
(4) For all injuries occurring on or after August 28, 1991, the weekly compensation
shall be an amount equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the injured employee's average
weekly earnings as of the date of the injury; provided that the weekly compensation paid
under this subdivision shall not exceed an amount equal to one hundred five percent of the
state average weekly wage;
(5) For all injuries occurring on or after September 28, 1981, the weekly
compensation shall in no event be less than forty dollars per week.
2. Permanent total disability benefits that have accrued through the date of the injured
employee's death are the only permanent total disability benefits that are to be paid in
accordance with section 287.230. The right to unaccrued compensation for permanent total
disability of an injured employee terminates on the date of the injured employee's death in
accordance with section 287.230, and does not survive to the injured employee's dependents,
estate, or other persons to whom compensation might otherwise be payable.
3. (1) All claims for permanent total disability shall be determined in accordance
with the facts. When an injured employee receives an award for permanent total disability
but by the use of glasses, prosthetic appliances, or physical rehabilitation the employee is
restored to his or her regular work or its equivalent, the life payment mentioned in subsection
1 of this section shall be suspended during the time in which the employee is restored to his or
her regular work or its equivalent. The employer and the division shall keep the file open in
the case during the lifetime of any injured employee who has received an award of permanent
total disability. In any case where the life payment is suspended under this subsection, the
commission may at reasonable times review the case and either the employee or the employer
may request an informal conference with the commission relative to the resumption of the
employee's weekly life payment in the case.
(2) Upon the filing of a written agreement signed by the claimant and his or her
attorney, the commission shall change the name, information, or fee arrangement of the
attorney or law firm associated with the claimant's case.

HCS HB 3072 3
4. For all claims filed on or after January 1, 2014, for occupational diseases due to
toxic exposure which result in a permanent total disability or death, benefits in this chapter
shall be provided as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, such amount as due to the
employee during said employee's life as provided for under this chapter for an award of
permanent total disability and death, except such amount shall only be paid when benefits
under subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection have been exhausted;
(2) For occupational diseases due to toxic exposure, but not including mesothelioma,
an amount equal to two hundred percent of the state's average weekly wage as of the date of
diagnosis for one hundred weeks paid by the employer; and
(3) In cases where occupational diseases due to toxic exposure are diagnosed to be
mesothelioma:
(a) For employers that have elected to accept mesothelioma liability under this
subsection, an additional amount of three hundred percent of the state's average weekly wage
for two hundred twelve weeks shall be paid by the employer or group of employers such
employer is a member of. Employers that elect to accept mesothelioma liability under this
subsection may do so by either insuring their liability, by qualifying as a self-insurer, or by
becoming a member of a group insurance pool. A group of employers may enter into an
agreement to pool their liabilities under this subsection. If such group is joined, individual
members shall not be required to qualify as individual self-insurers. Such group shall comply
with section 287.223. In order for an employer to make such an election, the employer shall
provide the department with notice of such an election in a manner established by the
department. The provisions of this paragraph shall expire on December 31, 2038; or
(b) For employers who reject mesothelioma under this subsection, then the exclusive
remedy provisions under section 287.120 shall not apply to such liability. The provisions of
this paragraph shall expire on December 31, 2038; and
(4) The provisions of subdivision (2) and paragraph (a) of subdivision (3) of this
subsection shall not be subject to suspension of benefits as provided in subsection 3 of this
section; and
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, should the
employee die before the additional benefits provided for in subdivision (2) and paragraph (a)
of subdivision (3) of this subsection are paid, the additional benefits are payable to the
employee's spouse or children, natural or adopted, legitimate or illegitimate, in addition to
benefits provided under section 287.240. If there is no surviving spouse or children and the
employee has received less than the additional benefits provided for in subdivision (2) and
paragraph (a) of subdivision (3) of this subsection the remainder of such additional benefits
shall be paid as a single payment to the estate of the employee;

HCS HB 3072 4
(6) The provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not be construed to
affect the employee's ability to obtain medical treatment at the employer's expense or any
other benefits otherwise available under this chapter.
5. Any employee who obtains benefits under subdivision (2) of subsection 4 of this
section for acquiring asbestosis who later obtains an award for mesothelioma shall not receive
more benefits than such employee would receive having only obtained benefits for
mesothelioma under this section.
287.470. 1. Upon its own motion or upon the application of any party in interest on
the ground of a change in condition, the commission may at any time upon a rehearing after
due notice to the parties interested review any award and on such review may make an award
ending, diminishing or increasing the compensation previously awarded, subject to the
maximum or minimum provided in this chapter, and shall immediately send to the parties and
the employer's insurer a copy of the award. No such review shall affect such award as regards
any moneys paid.
2. Upon the filing of a written agreement signed by the claimant and his or her
attorney and the new attorney, the commission shall change the name, information, or
fee arrangement of the attorney or law firm associated with the claimant's case.
✔